Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.060

Approval of petition—Requirements.

(1) The legislative authority may act on the petition to form a community facilities district at the public hearing held under RCW 36.145.050 and in no event may the legislative authority's decision be issued later than thirty days after the day of the public hearing. The applicable legislative authority may approve the petition by resolution if the applicable legislative authority determines, in its sole discretion, that the petitioners will benefit from the proposed district and that the formation of the district will be in the best interest of the county, city or town, as applicable, and that formation of the district is consistent with the requirements of Washington's growth management act.

(2) A community facilities district may not be formed unless each applicable legislative authority makes the finding required under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) All resolutions approving a petition must conform to the terms and conditions contained in the petition, including the maximum amounts of special assessments set forth in the petition, and must designate the name and number of the community facilities district being formed.

[ 2010 c 7 s 205.]